test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-18ehitues_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ehitüs: # Noun (18) ehitüs 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Nom: ehitüs
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Gen: ehitüse
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Par: ehitüst
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Ill: ehitüste
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Ine: [ehitüsen, ehitüseh, ehitüsehn]
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Ela: ehitüsest
     ehitüs+N+Sg+All: ehitüsele
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Ade: ehitüsel
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Abl: ehitüselt
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Tra: ehitüses
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Ter: ehitüseniq
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Abe: ehitüseldäq
     ehitüs+N+Sg+Com: ehitüsegaq
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Nom: ehitüseq
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Gen: [ehitüisi, ehitüste]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Par: ehitüisi
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Ill: [ehitüisihe, ehitüisi, ehitüiside]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Ela: [ehitüisist, ehitüstest]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+All: [ehitüisile, ehitüstele]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Ade: [ehitüisil, ehitüstel]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Abl: [ehitüisilt, ehitüstelt]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Tra: [ehitüisis, ehitüstes]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Ter: [ehitüisiniq, ehitüsteniq]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Abe: [ehitüisildäq, ehitüsteldäq]
     ehitüs+N+Pl+Com: [ehitüisigaq, ehitüstegaq]
